Utah statutes.
58-17b-303.   Qualifications for licensure as a pharmacist.
(1)  Each applicant for licensure as a pharmacist shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;
(b)  pay a fee as determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  produce satisfactory evidence of good moral character as it relates to
the applicant's ability to practice pharmacy;
(d)  complete a criminal background check and be free from criminal
convictions as required by Section 58-17b-307, or as described in Section
58-1-501;
(e)  have no physical or mental condition of a nature which prevents the
applicant from engaging in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill,
competency, and safety to the public;
(f)  have graduated and received a professional entry degree from a school or
college of pharmacy which is accredited by the Accreditation Council on
Pharmacy Education;
(g)  have completed an internship meeting standards established by division
rule made in collaboration with the board; and
(h)  have successfully passed examinations required by division rule made in
collaboration with the board.
(2)  Each applicant for licensure as a pharmacist whose pharmacy education was
completed at a foreign pharmacy school shall, in addition to the requirements
under Subsections (1)(a) through (e), (g), and (h), obtain a certification of
equivalency from a credentialing agency required by division rule made in
collaboration with the board.
(3)  Each applicant for a license by endorsement as a pharmacist under this
section shall:
(a)  submit a written application in the form prescribed by the division;
(b)  pay the fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  be of good moral character as required of applicants for licensure as
pharmacists under Subsection (1);
(d)  complete a criminal background check and be free from criminal
convictions as required by Section 58-17b-307, or as otherwise described in
Section 58-1-501;
(e)  have no physical or mental condition of a nature which prevents the
applicant from engaging in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill,
competency, and safety to the public;
(f)  have lawfully practiced as a licensed pharmacist a minimum of 2,000 hours
in the four years immediately preceding the date of application;
(g)  produce satisfactory evidence of completing the professional education
required under Subsection (1);
(h)  be currently licensed in good standing as a pharmacist in another state,
territory, or possession of the United States;
(i)  produce satisfactory evidence that the examination requirements are or
were at the time the license was issued, equal to those of this state; and
(j)  pass the jurisprudence examination prescribed by division rule made in
collaboration with the board.
